Louisiana, session 2026, SB522.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3983(A)(2)(a)(i) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:
3983(A)(2)(a)(v) and 3991.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3983. Chartering process by type; eligibility; limitations; faculty approval; parental
approval
A.(1) * * *
(2)(a)(i) Each proposal for a Type 1 or Type 3 charter school shall first be
made to the local school board with jurisdiction where the school is to be located,
except as provided for in Item (ii), (iii), or (iv), or (v) of this Subparagraph, by
submitting a written proposal. The applicant shall also provide notice of application
submission for a Type 1 or Type 3 charter school to the state Department of
Education. If, after review as required by R.S. 17:3982, the local school board denies
the proposal, or if conditions placed on the proposal by the local school board as
provided in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section are not acceptable to the chartering
group, then a proposal for a Type 2 charter school may be made to the state board.
* * *
(v) The initial proposal for a vocational and technical education charter
school, as provided in R.S. 17:3991.2, may be made to the state board as a
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 522 ENROLLED
proposal for a Type 2 charter school.
* * *
§3991.2. Vocational and technical education charter schools; enrollment
preferences; board membership
A. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The economic vitality of the state is dependent upon the education of
its people, including its current and future workforce.
(2) The performance of Louisiana's public education system is critical in
providing every Louisiana child with the ability to graduate, being equipped to
enter college or the workplace, in order to obtain a rewarding and self-
sustaining career and to contribute to society in meaningful ways.
(3) High-quality educational options are essential to the academic growth
of Louisiana's students and the ability of the state to expand existing businesses,
attract new businesses, and recruit and maintain a highly talented workforce.
(4) Manufacturing, industrial, technology, energy, utility, and other
sectors are all dependent on a workforce that has vocational training and
technical education.
(5) Providing students with access to classes or educational programs
directly aligned with high-demand and high-wage jobs will help provide
students with the experience and resources needed to help prepare them to be
effective employees and productive citizens.
(6) Encouraging and enhancing innovative vocational and technical
school curriculum models aligned with the state's workforce needs benefits the
state and its students.
B.(1) Notwithstanding geographic or other requirements for enrollment
contained in this Chapter, a charter agreement may provide, initially or by
amendment, for enrollment of students in a vocational and technical education
program.
(2)(a) Preference may be given to students whose parent or legal
guardian is employed or resides within the economic sector that is designated
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 522 ENROLLED
by the State Board of Commerce and Industry through a resolution of support
for the vocational and technical charter school, as provided in R.S. 51:934. Up
to fifty percent of the school's maximum enrollment may be reserved for the
enrollment preference.
(b) The charter agreement shall specify both the school's maximum
enrollment and the maximum proportion set aside for implementation of this
enrollment preference.
(3) In addition to the applicable requirements in R.S. 17:3991, the
application must be accompanied by a resolution from the State Board of
Commerce and Industry, as provided in R.S. 51:934, that includes the following:
(a) The specialty vocational and technical education classes or programs
to be offered by the charter school and the manner in which they are aligned
with high-demand and high-wage jobs or determined as STAR Jobs by
Louisiana Works.
(b) The school's maximum total enrollment, as well as the maximum
number of students that may be enrolled into each specialty vocational and
technical education class or program.
(c) A statement that the charter school and any vocational and technical
education classes or programs offered by the charter school are not aligned with
any corporation or business entity that is identified in R.S. 18:1505.2(L)(3).
(4)(a) A charter agreement may provide, initially or by amendment, for
board seats on its charter governing or management board to be held by various
industry representatives who are employed by or retired from a business
located within the economic sector or have served as an officer or director on
the board of such business. Such membership is subject to all other provisions
of law except those that are contrary to provisions in this Section and Chapter.
(b) For purposes of this Section, an industry representative may not be
an officer, board member, or employee of any corporation or legal entity that
is identified in R.S. 18:1505.2(L)(3).
C. For the duration of the enrollment preference specified in Paragraph
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 522 ENROLLED
(B)(1) of this Section, businesses located within the economic sector may enter
into memorandums of understanding with the charter school and shall specify
the methods by which the businesses may support the charter school, including
but not limited to internships for students, career counseling, academic
tutoring, or enrichment activities.
D.(1) An enrollment preference pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this
Section shall not be implemented in a way that displaces children enrolled at the
school at the time the charter agreement or amendment providing for the
preference is authorized.
(2) Enrollment at the school shall otherwise be as provided by this
Chapter.
E. As used in this Section, "STAR Jobs" or "Strategic Targeted Area
Resource Jobs" means those employment opportunities identified by the
Louisiana Works Commission that have high-demand, high-wage jobs and are
listed on the commission's website on the date of the application.
Section 2. R.S. 51:934 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§934. Resolutions of support for vocational and technical education charter
schools; economic sectors
A. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Economic development and the economic vitality of the state are
dependent upon an educated and highly trained workforce.
(2) Manufacturing, industrial, technology, energy, utility, and other
sectors are all dependent on a workforce that has vocational training and
technical education.
(3) High-quality educational options that include vocational and
technical educations are essential to the academic growth of Louisiana's
students and the ability of the state to attract businesses, maintain a highly
talented workforce, and expand existing businesses.
B. A majority of the members of the State Board of Commerce and
Industry may adopt a resolution in support of an application for a vocational
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 522 ENROLLED
and technical education charter school, pursuant to R.S. 17:3991.2 . If the State
Board of Commerce and Industry adopts a resolution, the resolution shall
include all of the following:
(1) An economic sector where jobs require vocational and technical
education training classes and employment skills associated therewith.
(2) A list of the types of vocational and technical education training
classes or skills that are needed for employment in the economic sector.
C. Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to this
Section:
(1) "Economic sector" means the economic development district or the
parishes or geographic area surrounding a location where manufacturing,
industrial, technology, energy, utility, and other sector facilities are, or will be,
located that require vocational and technical education to support employment
at the facilities. However an economic sector may not be established to provide
training for a corporation identified in R.S. 18:1505.2(L)(3).
(2) "Vocational and technical education charter schools" means those
charter schools governed by R.S. 17:3991.2.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.